Wisconsin, session 2025, SB648.
do enact as follows:SB648,11Section 1. 20.933 of the statutes is created to read:SB648,2,3220.933 Prohibiting state contracting with certain business entities. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:SB648,2,54(a) “Business entity” means any organization or enterprise engaged in 5commerce, whether or not operated for profit.SB648,3,26(b) “Contract” means to become a party to any agreement for the acquisition 1by purchase, lease, or barter of property, goods, or services for the direct benefit or 2use of any of the parties.SB648,3,33(c) “Department” means the department of administration.SB648,3,54(d) “Foreign country of concern” means a foreign adversary designated under 515 CFR 791.4.SB648,3,76(e) “Prohibited business entity” means a business entity that satisfies any of 7the following:SB648,3,981. Is primarily domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in a foreign country of 9concern.SB648,3,10102. Is headquartered in a foreign country of concern.SB648,3,11113. Has its principal place of business in a foreign country of concern.SB648,3,17124. Is controlled or is majority-owned by the government of the People’s 13Republic of China, the Chinese Communist Party, the Chinese military, or an 14instrumentality of any of the foregoing, including the State-owned Assets 15Supervision and Administration Commission of the State Council of the People’s 16Republic of China and the National Council for Social Security Fund of the People’s 17Republic of China.SB648,3,18185. Is a subsidiary of a business entity that satisfies subd. 1., 2., 3., or 4.SB648,3,20196. Sells the final products of a business entity described in subd. 1., 2., 3., 4., 20or 5. to a state agency.SB648,4,221(f) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 22commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, system, or other body 1in state government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any 2law, including the legislature and the courts.SB648,4,43(g) “Subsidiary” means a business entity that is majority owned, controlled, or 4operated by another business entity.SB648,4,65(2) Prohibited contracts. (a) No state agency may contract with a 6prohibited business entity.SB648,4,127(b) No contract between any person and a state agency shall be valid, binding, 8and enforceable unless the person provides prior written certification to the state 9agency that the person is not a prohibited business entity and that the person has 10made every effort to ensure that the goods or services being contracted for do not 11originate from a prohibited business entity. A state agency may rely on such 12certification without further investigation.SB648,4,1713(c) If any person contracting with a state agency becomes a prohibited 14business entity, the person shall be considered for that reason to have breached the 15contract, and the person shall without delay provide written notification of the 16breach to the state agency. The state agency may terminate the contract and may 17pursue all appropriate legal remedies for the breach.SB648,4,1918(3) Exemption. Subsection (2) does not prohibit a contract to which all of the 19following apply:SB648,4,2120(a) The goods or services offered under the contract are not obtainable by the 21state agency by other reasonable means.SB648,4,2322(b) The harm to the state in failing to execute the contract outweighs the 23public interests served by the prohibition under sub. (2).SB648,5,11(c) The contract is approved by the department.SB648,5,52(4) Complaints; forfeitures. Any person may file a complaint with the 3department alleging a violation of sub. (2) on a form prescribed by the department. 4The department shall investigate each complaint. If upon investigation the 5department determines a person has violated sub. (2), all of the following apply:SB648,5,76(a) The person shall be liable for a forfeiture equal to the greater of the 7following, as determined by the department:SB648,5,881. $250,000.SB648,5,1092. An amount equal to twice the amount of the value of the contract on which 10the person submitted a bid or proposal.SB648,5,12113. An amount equal to the total amount of all pecuniary losses suffered by any 12state as a result of such violation.SB648,5,1413(b) The person is ineligible to contract with a state agency for 5 years following 14the date of the department’s determination of a violation.SB648,5,1615(5) Enforcement. The attorney general may bring an action in any court of 16competent jurisdiction to enforce this section.SB648,5,1717